Utah statutes.
41-3-604.   Fee to cover the cost of electronic payments.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Electronic payment" has the same meaning as defined in Section 41-1a-1221.

(b)  "Electronic payment fee" has the same meaning as defined in Section 41-1a-1221.

(2) (a)  The division may collect a fee to cover the cost of electronic payments on the following transactions:

(i)  each purchase or renewal of a license under Section 41-3-202;

(ii)  each purchase of a book of temporary permits under Section 41-3-302;

(iii)  each penalty issued for a delinquent temporary permit under Section 41-3-302;

(iv)  each purchase of an in-transit permit under Section 41-3-305;

(v)  each purchase of a loaded demonstration permit under Section 41-3-502;

(vi)  each purchase of a license plate under Section 41-3-503; and

(vii)  each purchase of a salvage vehicle buyer license under Section 41-3-202.

(b)  The fee described in Subsection (2)(a):

(i)  shall be imposed regardless of the method of payment for a particular transaction; and

(ii)  need not be separately identified from the fees and penalty described in Subsections (2)(a)(i) through (vii).

(3)  The division shall establish the fee under Subsection (2)(a) according to the procedures and requirements of Section 63J-1-504.

(4)  A fee imposed under this section:

(a)  shall be used by the division as a dedicated credit to cover the costs of electronic payments; and

(b)  is not subject to Subsection 63J-2-202(2).

